nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.aff
FLAG num
SFX 9 Y 139
SFX 9 0 नु/15X,17X,20X .
SFX 9 0 नै/20X .
SFX 9 0 ने/17X,18X .
SFX 9 0 न/17X .
SFX 9 उ एर/17X उ
SFX 9 उ एन उ
SFX 9 उ एको/17X,26 उ
SFX 9 उ एका/17X,26 उ
SFX 9 उ एकि/17X,26 उ
SFX 9 0 ँदि उ
SFX 9 0 ँदै/17X उ
SFX 9 0 ँदो उ
SFX 9 0 ँदा/17X उ
SFX 9 0 ँछु उ
SFX 9 0 ँछौ उ
SFX 9 0 ँछौँ उ
SFX 9 0 ँछेस् उ
SFX 9 0 ँछस् उ
SFX 9 0 ँछ उ
SFX 9 0 ँछे उ
SFX 9 0 ँछ्यौ उ
SFX 9 0 ँछन् उ
SFX 9 0 ँछिन् उ
SFX 9 उ एन उ
SFX 9 उ एनौ उ
SFX 9 उ एनौँ उ
SFX 9 उ यौँ उ
SFX 9 उ यौ उ
SFX 9 उ ए/17X,21X उ
SFX 9 उ यो उ
SFX 9 उ एनन् उ
SFX 9 उ एस्/17X उ
SFX 9 उ औँ/17X उ
SFX 9 0 नेछन् उ
SFX 9 0 नेछ उ
SFX 9 0 नेछु उ
SFX 9 0 नेछौ उ
SFX 9 0 नेछौँ उ
SFX 9 0 नेछस् उ
SFX 9 0 नेछैनन् उ
SFX 9 0 नेछैनस् उ
SFX 9 0 नेछैनौ उ
SFX 9 0 नेछैनौँ उ
SFX 9 उ एछ उ
SFX 9 उ एछौँ उ
SFX 9 उ एछन् उ
SFX 9 0 ँथिस् उ
SFX 9 0 ँथ्यौ उ
SFX 9 0 ँथे उ
SFX 9 0 ँथ्यो उ
SFX 9 0 ँथ्यौँ उ
SFX 9 0 ँथि उ
SFX 9 0 ँथिन् उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैन उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैनौ उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैनौँ उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैनन् उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैछ उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैछु उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैछ उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैछौ उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैछौँ उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैनथ्यो उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैनथे उ
SFX 9 0 ँदैनथि उ
SFX 9 0 ँदिनौ उ
SFX 9 0 ँदिन उ
SFX 9 0 ँदिनन् उ
SFX 9 उ एनन् उ
SFX 9 उ एछौ उ
SFX 9 उ ओस्/17X उ
SFX 9 0 नेछैन उ
SFX 9 उ उन्जेल/17X उ
SFX 9 उ इन्जेल/17X उ
SFX 9 उ इन उ
SFX 9 उ इन् उ
SFX 9 उ इनस् उ
SFX 9 उ इनन् उ
SFX 9 उ इँन उ
SFX 9 उ इनौ उ
SFX 9 उ इस् उ
SFX 9 उ इ उ
SFX 9 उ इनेछ उ
SFX 9 उ इएला/17X उ
SFX 9 उ ऊन्/17X उ
SFX 9 उ ऊँ/17X उ
SFX 9 उ ऊ/17X उ
SFX 9 उ इछ उ
SFX 9 उ इछस् उ
SFX 9 उ इछन् उ
SFX 9 उ इरहेको उ
SFX 9 उ इदिए उ
SFX 9 उ इरहेछ उ
SFX 9 उ इरहेका उ
SFX 9 उ इरहेकि उ
SFX 9 उ इसकेको उ
SFX 9 उ इसकेका उ
SFX 9 उ इसकेकि उ
SFX 9 उ इसक्यो उ
SFX 9 उ इसक्नेछ उ
SFX 9 उ इसक्नुभयो उ
SFX 9 उ इसकेछ उ
SFX 9 0 0/17X उ
SFX 9 0 दि उ
SFX 9 0 दै/17X उ
SFX 9 0 दो उ
SFX 9 0 दा/17X उ
SFX 9 0 छु उ
SFX 9 0 छौ उ
SFX 9 0 छौ उ
SFX 9 0 छेस् उ
SFX 9 0 छस् उ
SFX 9 0 छे उ
SFX 9 0 छ्यौ उ
SFX 9 0 छन् उ
SFX 9 0 छिन् उ
SFX 9 उ औ/17X उ
SFX 9 0 थिस् उ
SFX 9 0 थ्यौ उ
SFX 9 0 थे उ
SFX 9 0 थ्यो उ
SFX 9 0 थ्यौ उ
SFX 9 0 थि उ
SFX 9 0 थिन् उ
SFX 9 0 दैन उ
SFX 9 0 दैनौ उ
SFX 9 0 दैनौ उ
SFX 9 0 दैनन् उ
SFX 9 0 दैछ उ
SFX 9 0 दैछु उ
SFX 9 0 दैछ उ
SFX 9 0 दैछौ उ
SFX 9 0 दैछौ उ
SFX 9 0 दैनथ्यो उ
SFX 9 0 दैनथे उ
SFX 9 0 दैनथि उ
SFX 9 0 दिनौ उ
SFX 9 0 दिन उ
SFX 9 0 दिनन् उ

SFX 10 Y 43
SFX 10 0 एर/17X [^ि]
SFX 10 0 एन .
SFX 10 0 एनौ .
SFX 10 0 एनौँ .
SFX 10 0 यौँ .
SFX 10 0 यो .
SFX 10 0 ए/17X,21X .
SFX 10 0 एँ .
SFX 10 0 एनन् .
SFX 10 0 एस्/17X [^ि]
SFX 10 0 इयो [^ि]
SFX 10 0 योस् [^ि]
SFX 10 0 एछ [^ि]
SFX 10 0 एछौँ [^ि]
SFX 10 0 एछौ [^ि]
SFX 10 0 एछन् [^ि]
SFX 10 0 इछन् [^ि]
SFX 10 0 उन्जेल/17X [ो]
SFX 10 0 इन्जेल/17X .
SFX 10 0 इन् .
SFX 10 0 इन .
SFX 10 0 इँन .
SFX 10 0 इनस् .
SFX 10 0 इनौ .
SFX 10 0 इनन् .
SFX 10 0 इस् .
SFX 10 0 इ .
SFX 10 0 ऊन्/17X [ो]
SFX 10 0 इएला/17X [^ि]
SFX 10 0 इछ [^ि]
SFX 10 0 इछस् [^ि]
SFX 10 0 ऊँ/17X [ो]
SFX 10 0 इनेछ [^ि]
SFX 10 0 एको/19X,17X [^ि]
SFX 10 0 एका/19X,17X [^ि]
SFX 10 0 एका/18X [^ि]
SFX 10 0 एकि/19X,17X [^ि]
SFX 10 0 एकै/19X,17X [^ि]
SFX 10 0 ऊ/17X [ो]
SFX 10 0 अोस्/17X [ो]
SFX 10 0 0/17X [ो]
SFX 10 0 यौ .
SFX 10 0 ए .

SFX 11 Y 74
SFX 11 0 नु/17X,20X .
SFX 11 0 ने/17X,18X .
SFX 11 0 ने/19X .
SFX 11 0 न/17X .
SFX 11 0 ँदि .
SFX 11 0 ँदा/17X .
SFX 11 0 ँदै/17X .
SFX 11 0 ँदो .
SFX 11 0 न्छु [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्छौ [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्छौं [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्छस् [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्छेस् [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्छ [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्छ्यौ [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्छन् [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्छन् [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्छिन् [^इ]
SFX 11 0 नेछौ [^इ]
SFX 11 0 नेछौँ [^इ]
SFX 11 0 नेछ [^इ]
SFX 11 0 नेछु [^इ]
SFX 11 0 नेछस् [^इ]
SFX 11 0 नेछैनौ [^इ]
SFX 11 0 नेछैन [^इ]
SFX 11 0 नेछैनौँ [^इ]
SFX 11 0 नेछैनस् [^इ]
SFX 11 0 नेछैनन् [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्थिस् [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्थ्यौ [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्थ्यौँ [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्थे [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्थेँ [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्थ्यो [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्थि [^इ]
SFX 11 0 न्थिन् [^इ]
SFX 11 0 ँदैन .
SFX 11 0 ँदैनौ .
SFX 11 0 ँदैनौँ .11
SFX 11 0 ँदिनौँ .
SFX 11 0 ँदिनौ .
SFX 11 0 ँदैनन् .
SFX 11 0 ँदैछ .
SFX 11 0 ँदैछे .
SFX 11 0 ँदैछौ .
SFX 11 0 ँदैछु .
SFX 11 0 ँदैछौँ .
SFX 11 0 ँदैनथ्यो .
SFX 11 0 ँदैनथे .
SFX 11 0 ँदैनथि .
SFX 11 0 ऊन्/17X [^इ]
SFX 11 0 ऊँ/17X [^इ]
SFX 11 0 ऊ/17X [^इ]
SFX 11 0 अोस्/17X [^इ]
SFX 11 0 उन्जेल/17X [^इ]
SFX 11 0 0/17X [^इ]
SFX 11 0 दि .
SFX 11 0 दा/17X .
SFX 11 0 दै/17X .
SFX 11 0 दो .
SFX 11 0 दैन .
SFX 11 0 दैनौ .
SFX 11 0 दैनौ .11
SFX 11 0 दिनौ .
SFX 11 0 दिनौ .
SFX 11 0 दैनन् .
SFX 11 0 दैछ .
SFX 11 0 दैछे .
SFX 11 0 दैछौ .
SFX 11 0 दैछु .
SFX 11 0 दैछौ .
SFX 11 0 दैनथ्यो .
SFX 11 0 दैनथे .
SFX 11 0 दैनथि .

#SFX 12 Y 15
#SFX 12 0 ओस् .
#SFX 12 0 उन्जेल .
#SFX 12 0 इन्जेल .
#SFX 12 0 इन .
#SFX 12 0 इनस् .
#SFX 12 0 इनौ .
#SFX 12 0 इनन् .
#SFX 12 0 इनेछ .
#SFX 12 0 इएला/17X .
#SFX 12 0 ऊन् .
#SFX 12 0 ला/17X .
#SFX 12 0 लास्/17X .
#SFX 12 0 लान्/17X .
#SFX 12 0 ऊँ/17X .
#SFX 12 0 ऊ/17X .

SFX 13 Y 7
SFX 13 0 को .
SFX 13 0 कै [^ेन]
SFX 13 0 का .
SFX 13 0 कि [^ि]
SFX 13 0 ले [^ा]
SFX 13 0 ै [^ँेिा]
SFX 13 0 ै [^ेिा]

SFX 14 Y 2
SFX 14 ो ा ो
SFX 14 ो ि ो

SFX 15 Y 19
SFX 15 0 को .
SFX 15 0 का .
SFX 15 0 कि .
SFX 15 0 मा .
SFX 15 0 ले .
SFX 15 0 लाइ .
SFX 15 0 बाट .
SFX 15 0 सँग .
SFX 15 0 सँगको .
SFX 15 0 सँगका .
SFX 15 0 सँगै .
SFX 15 0 द्वारा .
SFX 15 0 सित .
SFX 15 0 सहित .
SFX 15 0 बिना .
SFX 15 0 सग .
SFX 15 0 सगको .
SFX 15 0 सगका .
SFX 15 0 सगै .

SFX 16 Y 12
SFX 16 0 बाट .
SFX 16 0 सित .
SFX 16 0 सँग .
SFX 16 0 सँगै .
SFX 16 0 द्वारा .
SFX 16 0 कहाँ .
SFX 16 0 मा .
SFX 16 0 जस्तो .
SFX 16 0 भित्र .
SFX 16 0 सग .
SFX 16 0 सगै .
SFX 16 0 कहा .


PFX 17 Y 1
PFX 17 0 न .

SFX 18 Y 22
SFX 18 0 हरु .
SFX 18 0 हरुदेखि .
SFX 18 0 हरुप्रति .
SFX 18 0 हरुबारे .
SFX 18 0 हरुबारेको .
SFX 18 0 हरुसमेत .
SFX 18 0 हरुबिच .
SFX 18 0 हरुको .
SFX 18 0 हरुका .
SFX 18 0 हरुले .
SFX 18 0 हरुलाइ .
SFX 18 0 हरुबाट .
SFX 18 0 हरुसँग .
SFX 18 0 हरुसँगको .
SFX 18 0 हरुसँगै .
SFX 18 0 हरुद्वारा .
SFX 18 0 हरुसित .
SFX 18 0 हरुमा .
SFX 18 0 हरुमाथि .
SFX 18 0 हरुसग .
SFX 18 0 हरुसगको .
SFX 18 0 हरुसगै .

SFX 19 Y 12
SFX 19 0 ले .
SFX 19 0 लाइ .
SFX 19 0 बाट .
SFX 19 0 सँग .
SFX 19 0 सँगै .
SFX 19 0 द्वारा .
SFX 19 0 सित .
SFX 19 0 मा .
SFX 19 0 को .
SFX 19 0 का .
SFX 19 0 सग .
SFX 19 0 सगै .

SFX 20 Y 19
SFX 20 0 अघि .
SFX 20 0 हुनेछ .
SFX 20 0 भएको .
SFX 20 0 भए .
SFX 20 0 भएका .
SFX 20 0 होस् .
SFX 20 0 स् .
SFX 20 0 हुन्छ .
SFX 20 0 हुन्थ्यो .
SFX 20 0 पर्थ्यो .
SFX 20 0 पर्यो .
SFX 20 0 पर्दैन .
SFX 20 0 पर्दा .
SFX 20 0 पर्ने .
SFX 20 0 पर्नेमा .
SFX 20 0 पर्नेछ .
SFX 20 0 पर्छ .
SFX 20 0 भयो .
SFX 20 0 भन्दा .

SFX 21 Y 11
SFX 21 0 पछि .
SFX 21 0 पछिका .
SFX 21 0 अघि .
SFX 21 0 अघिका .
SFX 21 0 जस्तो .
SFX 21 0 देखि .
SFX 21 0 मात्र .
SFX 21 0 सम्म .
SFX 21 0 सम्बन्धि .
SFX 21 0 प्रति .
SFX 21 0 बारे .


SFX 22 Y 48
SFX 22 0 पट्टि .
SFX 22 0 मध्ये .
SFX 22 0 पनि .
SFX 22 0 तर्फ .
SFX 22 0 बिच .
SFX 22 0 पछि .
SFX 22 0 मार्फत .
SFX 22 0 माथि .
SFX 22 0 माथिबाट .
SFX 22 0 माथिको .
SFX 22 0 माथिका .
SFX 22 0 झैँ .
SFX 22 0 मै .
SFX 22 0 अघि .
SFX 22 0 अघिदेखि .
SFX 22 0 पछिका .
SFX 22 0 पछिको .
SFX 22 0 पछिकि .
SFX 22 0 जस्तो .
SFX 22 0 जस्ता .
SFX 22 0 जस्तै .
SFX 22 0 देखि .
SFX 22 0 मात्र .
SFX 22 0 सम्म .
SFX 22 0 सम्ममा .
SFX 22 0 सम्मको .
SFX 22 0 सम्मका .
SFX 22 0 भित्र .
SFX 22 0 भित्रमा .
SFX 22 0 भित्रको .
SFX 22 0 भित्रका .
SFX 22 0 भित्रै .
SFX 22 0 प्रति .
SFX 22 0 भन्दा .
SFX 22 0 भन्दापर .
SFX 22 0 बारे .
SFX 22 0 समेत .
SFX 22 0 कै .
SFX 22 0 लगायत .
SFX 22 0 लगायतका .
SFX 22 0 सम्बन्धि .
SFX 22 0 तिर .
SFX 22 0 बाहेक .
SFX 22 0 सहित .
SFX 22 0 सहितका .
SFX 22 0 सहितको .
SFX 22 0 अनुसार .
SFX 22 0 झै .


SFX 23 Y 4
SFX 23 0 0/24X .
SFX 23 0 ि/24X .
SFX 23 0 ाउ/24X .
SFX 23 0 ाइ/24X .
