nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.dic
अठारभाइ/18,22,15
अत्यासलाग्दो/14
अधुरो/14
अन्तर्घात/18,22,15
अन्त्येस्टि/18,22,15
अपुत/18,22,15
अभिसेचन/15,22,34
अभेकिलो/14
अरर्याउ/9,42
अर्को/19
अर्धकट्टि/18,22,15
अलचिलो/14
अस्पताल/18,22,15
आँक/15,22
आँकुरो/18,22,15
आँखालाग्दो/14
आदिवासि/18,22,15
आफैँ/16
आलम्बन/15,22
आलस/15,22
आसय/18,22,15
इत्तरो/14
इसाइ/18,22,15
उक्साउ/9,42
उड्दो/14
उडाउ/9,42
उत्तिस/18,22,15
उत्तेजन/15,22,36
उन्मुक्ति/18,22,15
उनि/16,18,27
उब्जिलो/14
उम्त्याउ/9,42
उर्मिला/18,22,15
उस्तो/14
उहाँ/15,22,16,18
उहि/16
एकोहरो/14
एडप्टर/18,22,15
एनआरटि/15,22
ऐस-आराम/18,22,15
ओछ्याउ/9,42
ओर्ल/23
कच्चो/14
कज्याउ/9,42
कत्ला/18,22,15
कमल/18,22,15
कमलो/14
कम्पमान/15,22
कमौत/18,22,15
कल्पाउ/9,42
कस/16
कसै/19
क्याबिन/18,22,15
क्षमदान/15,22
क्षिर/15,22
काँचो/14
कागजात/18,22,15
कार्यव्यापार/18,22,15
किम्बु/15,22
किराना/18,22,15
किर्तन/18,22,15
कुचुर्क्याउ/9,42
कुन/13
कुलिन/18,22,15
कैलो/14
को/16
कोक्याउ/9,42
कोत्रि/8,43,17
कोर्कालि/15,22
कोल/15,22
खगौतो/18,22,15
खत्याउ/9,42
खाँदिलो/14
खाट/18,22,15
खिचाउ/9,42
खुलाउ/9,42
खेतिपाति/18,22,15
खेल/18,22,15
खोक्रो/14
खोजि/18,22,15
खोल्स्याउ/9,42
ग/10
गडगड्याउ/9,42
गतिलो/14
गम्क/23
गम्छा/18,22,15
गहकिलो/14
गिजा/18,22,15
गिजोलाउ/9,42
गितार/18,22,15
गिरावट/15,22
गुनिलो/14
गुर्काउ/9,42
गोदत्तप्रसाद/18,22,15
घस्टाउ/9,42
घाँसि/18,22,15
घिडघिडो/14
घुमाउ/9,42
ङिस्याउ/9,42
चक्रि/15,22
चड्कन/18,22,15
चम्क/23
चम्किलो/14
चर्च/18,22,15
चिकाउ/9,42
चिप्लोचाप्लो/14
चिम/18,22,15
चिस्याउ/9,42
चुल्ठ्याउ/9,42
चेप्टो/14
चोराउ/9,42
चौक/18,22,15
चौकिदार/18,22,15
चौखुर/15,22
छराउ/9,42
छात्रा/19
छिचरो/14
छिमलाउ/9,42
छुरा/18,22,15
छो/10
छोडाउ/9,42
जनसरकार/18,22,15
जनहित/15,22
जन्मजात/15,22
जलाउ/9,42
जस/16
जहरिलो/14
ज्याक/18,22,15
जा/11,47
जिवनयापन/18,22,15
जुन/13
जुम्‍ला/15,22
जुम्सो/14
जुलाफ/15,22
जे/13
जो/16
जोखाउ/9,42
झ्वाँक/18,22,15
झिसिलो/14
झुन्ड्याउ/9,42
झुम्म/23
टाँचा/18,22,15
टिकुलि/15,22
टिठ्याउ/9,42
टिपोट/18,22,15
टिबटो/14
ठिङ्ग्याउ/9,42
ठुलो/14
डिबिया/18,22,15
डेपुटि/18,22,15
डेस्क/18,22,15
ढकाउ/9,42
तथौरो/14
तपाइँ/13,16,18
त्यस/22,19,13
त्यहाँ/13
त्यहि/16
त्यो/16
ताजमहल/18,22,15
तातोपानि/15,22
ताम्रपत्र/18,22,15
तिनि/16,18
तुरतुराउँदो/14
तुर्क्याउ/9,42
थि/10
थेगाउ/9,42
थोत्रोमोत्रो/14
थोप्ला/15,22
दृस्यबटन/15,22
दावा/15,22
दाह्रि/15,22
दिने/17
दुधिलो/14
दुर्दसा/18,22,15
धड्काउ/9,42
धरणि/18,22,15
धर्म/15,22,35,36,40
धो/10
नकटोछकटो/14
न्यायाधिस/18,22,15
नाडि/18,22,15
नातेदार/18,22,15
निक्लाउ/9,42
निर्धो/14
नौरथा/15,22
पृथिवि/15,22
पखेटा/18,22,15
पग्राउ/9,42
पगितो/14
परिप्रेक्ष्य/15,22
परिमार्जन/15,22
पल्ट/23
पसाङ्ग्याउ/9,42
प्यारा/18,22,15
प्यारो/14
प्रलेप/15,22
प्रवासि/18,22,15
प्रेयसि/18,22,15
पालिस/15,22
पावेल/15,22
पर्ला/17
पुरस्कार/18,22,15
पैह्राउ/9,42
पोतारि/18,22,15
पोल/15,22
फकौरो/14
फिसोलाउ/9,42
फुको/14
फोको/18,22,15
बङ्‍गला/18,22,15
बच्चि/18,22,15
बढाउ/9,42
बह/15,22,23
बाँझो/14
बाँध/18,22,15
बाउसो/15,22
बागलुङ/15,22
बिताउ/9,42
बिब्लेंटो/14
बुद्धिचाल/15,22
बुर्का/15,22
बेठि/18,22,15
बैँक/18,22,15,21
बोक्‌र्याउ/9,42
बोधो/14
भ/10
भविस्यतकाल/15,22
भ्रमण/15,22
भुङ्ग्‌र्याउ/9,42
भेडो/14
भोल्टेज/15,22
भोलि/13
मृत्यु/15,22
मन्त्रालय/18,22,15
मसेल्लो/14
महाधिवेसन/15,22
महापुरुस/18,22,15
मासाउ/9,42
मिनट/15,22
मिलन/15,22
मुल्य/15,22,18
यस/15,21
यसपटक/13
यस्तो/14
यहि/16
याक/15,22
यार/15,22
यो/16
रगडाउ/9,42
राना/18,22,15
रामकुमारि/15,22
रुपौलो/14
रो/10
रोजाउ/9,42
लखनउ/18,22,15
लत्को/15,22
लबस्तरो/14
लम्ब/15,22
लिप्ट्याउ/9,42
लुत्रो/14
वृस्चिक/18,22,15
वक्‍तृत्व/15,22
वाचा/18,22,15,39
वात्सल्य/15,22
वामदेव/15,22
विराम/18,22,15
विलम्ब /15,22
सर्मिला/18,22,15
स्रमजिवि/18,22,15
स्रिमति/18,22,15
सँच्याउ/9,42
सङ्गमर्मर/15,22
सङ्लो/14
सच्चा/15,22
सत्यनारायण/18,22,15
सम्बत/15,22
सम्मोह/15,22
सहज्याउ/9,42
सहभागि/18,22,19
सहसेनानि/18,22,15
स्तन/18,22,15
स्थापनाकाल/15,22
स्पस्ट/23,31,33
साँघुरो/14
सावधान/15,22
साहित्य/15,22,39
सिङ्गो/14
सिलोक/18,22,15
सुन्तला/18,22,15
सुपरिवेक्षण/15,22
सुलाउ/9,42
हनाइ/15,22
हबिगत/15,22
हलकारा/18,22,15
हाम्रो/14
हिस्सेदारि/15,22
हुक/15,22
हुरेलाउ/9,42
होइ/11
काँमिडाँडा/15,22
काभ्रेपलान्चोक/15,22
गोसाइँथान/15,22
घाङ्गला/15,22
डुम्रिसे/15,22
ढुङ्गेगाउँ/15,22
फुन्चेबुङ/15,22
फुले/15,22
लिङतेप/15,22
लुङ्खे/15,22
पल्ट/23
कुर्ल/23
उभ/23
बुर्क/23
पौड/23
बाउ/23
गुन्ज/23
निख्र/23
लड्क/23
लुर्क/23
हुर्र/23
भिड्क/23
विच्क/23
गुत्थ/23
अन्म/23
खच्क/23
टङ्च/23
खुरमुर/23
घँस/23
दुब्लाउ/9,42
ओइर/23
खैँच/23
छिर्क/23
तौल/23
पकड/23
सिन्च/23
सिर्ज/23
फड्क/23
मुसा/23
उछ्र्/23
मनपर्/23
तैर/23
बज्र/23
खौस्र/23
विउँझ/23
भड्क/23,41
रुझ/23
रुवाउ/9,42
आफै/16
उहा/15,22,16,18
काकडभिट्टा/15,22
कासो/15,22
काहिलो/14
खडुकुलो/18,22,15
घसिलो/14
छिकाउ/9,42
झिल्स्याइदो/14
तपाइ/13,16,18
त्यहा/13
पचपचाउदो/14
फजाउ/9,42
मडारिदो/14
लुइटेल/18,22,15
साचो/14
सुघाउ/9,42
जैसिडाडा/15,22
डिल्लिगाउ/15,22
घस/23
खैच/23
विउझ/23
